tools/nvda/louis/tables/syc.utb
# liblouis: Syriac
#
#-index-name: Syriac
#-display-name: Syriac braille

#+language: syc
#+language: syr-Syrc
#+language: syr-Syre
#+language: syr-Syrj
#+language: syr-Syrn
#+type: literary
#+contraction: no
#+dots: 6

#-license: lgpl-2.1

# This file is free software; you can redistribute it and/or
# modify it under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public
# License as published by the Free Software Foundation; either
# version 2.1 of the License, or (at your option) any later version.
#
# This file is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the GNU
# Lesser General Public License for more details.
#
# You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
# License along with this file; if not, write to the Free Software
# Foundation, Inc., 51 Franklin Street, Fifth Floor, Boston, MA  02110-1301  USA
# liblouis  comes with ABSOLUTELY NO WARRANTY.

# This table provides support for ʾEsṭrangēlā, Maḏnḥāyā and Serṭā
# Syriac also known as Old, Eastern and Western Syriac. For more
# information, please see
# <https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Syriac_language>

# This braille code was developed by a group of both blind and sighted
# scholars in an academic setting. Special thank you to Paul Keim, Ray
# McAllister, and Matthew Yeater for development of the braille code
# for this language.  Also thanks to Sarah LaRose for the suggestions
# while serving on the committee.

#-maintainer: Paul Geoghegan <contact@envisionly.tech>
#-maintainer: Matityhau Yeshurun <yeatersink@gmail.com>

# Copyright (C) 2024 Matt Yeater and Paul Geoghegan

# always op code characters
always ܐ 1  # ALAPH
always ܐ݁ 1-2  # ALAPH and QUSHSHAYA
always ܐ݂ 1-3  # ALAPH and RUKKAKHA
always ܑ݁ 26-1-2  # SUPERSCRIPT ALAPH  and QUSHSHAYA
always ܑ݂ 26-1-3  # SUPERSCRIPT ALAPH  and RUKKAKHA
always ܒ݁ 12-2  # BETH and QUSHSHAYA
always ܒ݂ 12-3  # BETH and RUKKAKHA
always ܓ݁ 1245-2  # GAMAL and QUSHSHAYA
always ܓ݂ 1245-3  # GAMAL and RUKKAKHA
always ܔ݁ 26-1245-2  # GAMAL GARSHUNI and QUSHSHAYA
always ܔ݂ 26-1245-3  # GAMAL GARSHUNI and RUKKAKHA
always ܕ݁ 145-2  # DALATH and QUSHSHAYA
always ܕ݂ 145-3  # DALATH and RUKKAKHA
always ܖ݁ 26-145-2  # DOTLESS DALATH RISH and QUSHSHAYA
always ܖ݂ 26-145-3  # DOTLESS DALATH RISH and RUKKAKHA
always ܗ݁ 125-2  # HE and QUSHSHAYA
always ܗ݂ 125-3  # HE and RUKKAKHA
always ܘ݁ 2456-2  # WAW and QUSHSHAYA
always ܘ݂ 2456-3  # WAW and RUKKAKHA
always ܙ݁ 1356-2  # ZAIN and QUSHSHAYA
always ܙ݂ 1356-3  # ZAIN and RUKKAKHA
always ܚ݁ 1346-2  # HETH and QUSHSHAYA
always ܚ݂ 1346-3  # HETH and RUKKAKHA
always ܛ݁ 2345-2  # TETH and QUSHSHAYA
always ܛ݂ 2345-3  # TETH and RUKKAKHA
always ܜ݁ 26-2345-2  # TETH GARSHUNI and QUSHSHAYA
always ܜ݂ 26-2345-3  # TETH GARSHUNI and RUKKAKHA
always ܝ݁ 245-2  # YUDH and QUSHSHAYA
always ܝ݂ 245-3  # YUDH and RUKKAKHA
always ܞ݁ 245-125-2  # YUDH HE and QUSHSHAYA
always ܞ݂ 245-125-3  # YUDH HE and RUKKAKHA
always ܟ݁ 13-2  # KAPH and QUSHSHAYA
always ܟ݂ 13-3-3  # KAPH and RUKKAKHA
always ܠ݁ 123-2  # LAMADH and QUSHSHAYA
always ܠ݂ 123-3  # LAMADH and RUKKAKHA
always ܡ݁ 134-2  # MIM and QUSHSHAYA
always ܡ݂ 134-3  # MIM and RUKKAKHA
always ܢ݁ 1345-2  # NUN and QUSHSHAYA
always ܢ݂ 1345-3  # NUN and RUKKAKHA
always ܣ݁ 234-2  # SEMKATH and QUSHSHAYA
always ܣ݂ 234-3  # SEMKATH and RUKKAKHA
always ܤ݁ 26-234-2  # FINAL SEMKATH and QUSHSHAYA
always ܤ݂ 26-234-3  # FINAL SEMKATH and RUKKAKHA
always ܥ݁ 1246-2  # E and QUSHSHAYA
always ܥ݂ 1246-3  # E and RUKKAKHA
always ܦ݁ 1234-2  # PE and QUSHSHAYA
always ܦ݂ 1234-3  # PE and RUKKAKHA
always ܧ݁ 26-1234-2  # REVERSED PE and QUSHSHAYA
always ܧ݂ 26-1234-3  # REVERSED PE and RUKKAKHA
always ܨ݁ 2346-2  # SADHE and QUSHSHAYA
always ܨ݂ 2346-3  # SADHE and RUKKAKHA
always ܩ݁ 12345-2  # QAPH and QUSHSHAYA
always ܩ݂ 12345-3  # QAPH and RUKKAKHA
always ܪ݁ 1235-2  # RISH and QUSHSHAYA
always ܪ݂ 1235-3  # RISH and RUKKAKHA
always ܫ݂ 146-3  # SHIN and RUKKAKHA
always ܬ݁ 1256-2  # TAW and QUSHSHAYA
always ܬ݂ 1256-3  # TAW and RUKKAKHA

# letter op code characters
letter ܑ 26-1  # SUPERSCRIPT ALAPH
letter ܒ 12  # BETH
letter ܓ 1245  # GAMAL
letter ܔ 26-1245  # GAMAL GARSHUNI
letter ܕ 145  # DALATH
letter ܖ 26-145  # DOTLESS DALATH RISH
letter ܗ 125  # HE
letter ܘ 2456  # WAW
letter ܙ 1356  # ZAIN
letter ܚ 1346  # HETH
letter ܛ 2345  # TETH
letter ܜ 26-2345  # TETH GARSHUNI
letter ܝ 245  # YUDH
letter ܞ 245-125  # YUDH HE
letter ܟ 13  # KAPH
letter ܠ 123  # LAMADH
letter ܡ 134  # MIM
letter ܢ 1345  # NUN
letter ܣ 234  # SEMKATH
letter ܤ 26-234  # FINAL SEMKATH
letter ܥ 1246  # E
letter ܦ 1234  # PE 
letter ܧ 26-1234  # REVERSED PE
letter ܨ 2346  # SADHE
letter ܩ 12345  # QAPH
letter ܪ 1235  # RISH
letter ܫ 146  # SHIN
letter ܬ 1256  # TAW
letter ܭ 26  # PERSIAN BHETH
letter ܮ 26-2356  # PERSIAN GHAMAL
letter ܯ 26-256  # PERSIAN DHALATH
letter ܰ 12356  # Pthaha ABOVE
letter ܱ 16  # Pthaha BELOW
letter ܲ 14  # Pthaha DOTTED
letter ܳ 345  # Zqapha ABOVE
letter ܴ 156  # Zqapha BELOW
letter ܵ 126  # Zqapha DOTTED
letter ܶ 15  # Rbasa ABOVE
letter ܷ 26  # Rbasa BELOW
letter ܸ 34  # DOTTED ZLAMA HORIZONTAL
letter ܹ 456  # DOTTED ZLAMA ANGULAR
letter ܺ 24  # Hbasa ABOVE
letter ܻ 35  # Hbasa  BELOW
letter ܼ 26  # Hbasa-Esasa DOTTED
letter ܽ 136  # ESASA ABOVE
letter ܾ 1236  # ESASA BELOW
letter ܿ 135  # Rwaha
letter ݀ 5-124  # FEMININE DOT
letter ݁ 2  # QUSHSHAYA
letter ݂ 3  # RUKKAKHA
letter ݃ 256-12  # TWO VERTICAL DOTS ABOVE
letter ݄ 356-256  # TWO VERTICAL DOTS BELOW
letter ݅ 256-125  # THREE DOTS ABOVE
letter ݆ 356  # THREE DOTS BELOW
letter ݇ 256-45  # OBLIQUE LINE ABOVE
letter ݈ 256  # OBLIQUE LINE BELOW
letter ݉ 256-146  # MUSIC
letter ݊ 256-1236  # BARREKH
letter ݍ 26-1356  # SOGDIAN ZHAIN
letter ݎ 26-13  # SOGDIAN KHAPH
letter ݏ 26-124  # SOGDIAN FE

# punctuation op code characters
punctuation ̄ 45-4-36  # macron above
punctuation ̈ 45-25  #  Combining Diaeresis.
punctuation ̱ 45-4-36  # Macron Below
punctuation ܀ 256-1234  # END OF PARAGRAPH
punctuation ܁ 235  # SUPRALINEAR FULL STOP
punctuation ܂ 256  # SUBLINEAR FULL STOP
punctuation ܃ 256-14  # SUPRALINEAR COLON
punctuation ܄ 256-36  # SUBLINEAR COLON
punctuation ܅ 356-256-25  # HORIZONTAL COLON
punctuation ܆ 236  # COLON SKEWED LEFT
punctuation ܇ 356  # COLON SKEWED RIGHT
punctuation ܈ 256-156  # SUPRALINEAR COLON SKEWED LEFT
punctuation ܉ 256-234  # SUBLINEAR COLON SKEWED RIGHT
punctuation ܊ 256-3  # CONTRACTION
punctuation ܋ 256-135  # HARKLEAN OBELUS
punctuation ܌ 256-134  # HARKLEAN METOBELUS
punctuation ܍ 356-256-35  # HARKLEAN ASTERISCUS
punctuation ܏ 256-1  # ABBREVIATION MARK

# Include additional braille tables
include spaces.uti
include litdigits6Dots.uti
include latinLetterDef6Dots.uti
include en-ueb-chardefs.uti
